Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2815
Dialysis drug or device distributor, defined.

Dialysis drug or device distributor means a manufacturer or wholesaler who provides dialysis drugs, solutions, supplies, or devices, to persons with chronic kidney failure for self-administration at the person's home or specified address, pursuant to a prescription.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 911.